Colorado, session 2026A, SB157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 31-3-201 as
follows:
31-3-201. Procedure for determination of abandonment.
(1) A TOWN MAY BE DETERMINED TO BE ABANDONED:
(a) When any town has failed, for a period of five years or longer
immediately prior to the filing of the application under this section, to hold
any regular or special election or to elect officers and to maintain any town
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

government; such town may be determined to be abandoned as follows: OR
(b) WHEN ANY TOWN DOES NOT HAVE A BOARD OF TRUSTEES OR
TOWN CLERK, IS UNABLE TO HOLD AN ELECTION, AND OWNS OR OPERATES
WATER INFRASTRUCTURE CRITICAL FOR THE TREATMENT OR DELIVERY OF
WATER TO RESIDENTS. IF A TOWN IS ABANDONED PURSUANT TO THIS
SUBSECTION (1)(b):
(I) THE COUNTY IS NOT LIABLE FOR THE DEBT OR OTHER
OBLIGATIONS OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS OF THE TOWN RELATED TO THE
WATER SYSTEM; AND
(II) UPON ABANDONMENT OF THE TOWN, THE COUNTY SHALL
TRANSFER ALL REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY COMPRISING THE WATER
SYSTEM FROM THE COUNTY TO AN ENTITY THAT HAS THE PRIMARY PURPOSE
OF WATER TREATMENT OR DELIVERY, UNLESS OTHERWISE DETERMINED BY
THE COUNTY.
(2) THE PROCEDURE TO DETERMINE THAT A TOWN IS ABANDONED IS
AS FOLLOWS:
(a) The county attorney of the county in which the town is located,
or any owner of land in such IN THE TOWN, OR ANY REGISTERED ELECTOR OF
THE town may make application to the secretary of state to determine that
the town is abandoned.
(b) The secretary of state shall forthwith cause notice of the filing
of such application to be published once in some newspaper of general
circulation in the county and, where possible, to be posted in at least two
conspicuous locations within the town ON THE SECRETARY OF STATE'S
WEBSITE AND IN AT LEAST TWO CONSPICUOUS LOCATIONS WITHIN THE TOWN.
The notice shall specify the date, time, and place where said THE application
will be heard, which date shall be not less than twenty days after the date of
such publication.
(c) The secretary of state shall hear such THE application and, after
receiving evidence thereon, shall determine whether or not said THE town
has been abandoned. If he THE SECRETARY determines that the town is
abandoned, THE SECRETARY SHALL FILE a copy of such THE determination
shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which said
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-157

THE town was located. Thereupon, said THE town shall cease to exist.
(d) The books, documents, records, papers, and corporate seal of any
town so abandoned PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION shall be deposited with the
county clerk and recorder of the county within which the town or any part
thereof is located, for safekeeping and reference in the future.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-1.5-208, add (4)(d)
as follows:
25-1.5-208. Grant program for public water systems and
domestic wastewater treatment works - small communities water and
wastewater grant fund - rules - repeal.
(4) (d) NOTWITHSTANDING THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF
THIS SECTION REGARDING THE PERMISSIBLE USES OF MONEY IN THE FUND, IF
AN APPLICATION FOR THE ABANDONMENT OF A TOWN HAS BEEN FILED WITH
THE SECRETARY OF STATE PURSUANT TO SECTION 31-3-201(1)(b) AND THE
TOWN OWNS OR OPERATES A WATER SYSTEM THAT IS FAILING OR IS LIKELY
TO FAIL, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
TRANSFER UP TO ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS FROM THE FUND TO THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
TO CONTRACT FOR THE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF THE TOWN'S
EXISTING WATER TREATMENT INFRASTRUCTURE.
(I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY SHALL USE MONEY
TRANSFERRED FROM THE FUND PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(d) ONLY
TO CONTRACT FOR THE ROUTINE OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING
WATER TREATMENT INFRASTRUCTURE FOR THE TOWN, SUCH AS THE
OPERATION OF THE CHLORINE DISINFECTION SYSTEM AND ASSOCIATED
SAMPLING AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, AND NOT FOR
IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WATER SYSTEM OR OTHER PROJECTS THAT REQUIRE
MORE SIGNIFICANT EXPENDITURES. THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
SHALL USE MONEY TRANSFERRED FROM THE FUND ONLY AFTER AN
APPLICATION FOR ABANDONMENT OF A TOWN IS FILED WITH THE SECRETARY
OF STATE, UNTIL THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAKES A FINAL DETERMINATION
ON THAT APPLICATION; EXCEPT THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY
MAY USE THE MONEY FROM THE FUND FOR AN ADDITIONAL SIX MONTHS
AFTER THE SECRETARY OF STATE MAKES A FINAL DETERMINATION ON THE
APPLICATION FOR ABANDONMENT OF THE TOWN IF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-157

PUBLIC SAFETY DETERMINES, ON A MONTHLY BASIS, THAT THE USE OF
MONEY FROM THE FUND IS NECESSARY.
(II) ANY ASSISTANCE PROVIDED FOR THE ROUTINE MAINTENANCE OR
OPERATION OF EXISTING WATER TREATMENT INFRASTRUCTURE PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (4)(d) IS TEMPORARY AND DOES NOT TRANSFER
OWNERSHIP OF THE WATER SYSTEM TO THE STATE. THE STATE IS NOT
RESPONSIBLE OR LIABLE FOR THE WATER SYSTEM OR THE DEBTS,
OBLIGATIONS, OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS OF THE TOWN FOR WHICH AN
APPLICATION FOR ABANDONMENT WAS FILED.
(III) THIS SUBSECTION (4)(d) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
SECTION 3. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$100,000 is appropriated to the department of public safety. This
appropriation is from reappropriated funds from the small communities
water and wastewater grant fund created in section 25-1.5-208 (4)(a)(I),
C.R.S., which is continuously appropriated to the department of public
health and environment. To implement this act, the department may use this
appropriation for the office of emergency management.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-157

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-157